Utah statutes.
78B-6-410.   Suit by fiduciary or representative.
Any person interested as or through an executor, administrator, trustee,
guardian, or other fiduciary, creditor, devisee, legatee, heir, next of kin,
or cestui que trust, in the administration of a trust, or of the estate of a
decedent, an infant, lunatic, or insolvent, may petition the court for a
declaratory judgment:
(1)  to ascertain any class of creditors, devisees, legatees, heirs, next of
kin, or others;
(2)  to direct the executors, administrators, or trustees to do or abstain
from doing any particular act in their fiduciary capacity; or
(3)  to determine any question arising in the administration of the estate or
trust, including questions of construction of wills and other writings.
